chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0
 %{Ӑ%}:ӑ %{Ӑ%}:ӗ %{Ӑ%}:0
 %{ь%}:ь %{ь%}:0
;
Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ е ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

ArchiCns = %{м%} ;

Rules

"1"

%>:0 <=> _ ;

"2"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;

"3"
%{Ӑ%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns:| Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
         %{м%}: %>: _ н;
"4"
%{Ӑ%}:0 <=> %{м%}: %>:_ н ; 

"5"
%{м%}:м <=>_;
 
"6"
%{A%}:Vy <=> :Vx _ ;
      where Vx in ( a e o )
            Vy in ( a e o )
      matched ;
